Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-131
Publication.

Ordinances passed by cities of all classes and villages must be posted, published in a legal newspaper in or of general circulation in the respective cities or villages, or published in book, pamphlet, or electronic form, as required by their respective charters or general laws.

Laws 1933, c. 111, § 1, p. 451;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 18-1501;

R.S.1943, § 18-131;

Laws 2021, LB159, § 6;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 2.